Utah statutes.
59-15-108.   Construction and equipment of establishments.

No brewery or other establishment may be constructed or equipped in a manner which facilitates any breach of this chapter or the rules of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission or State Tax Commission.  Any structure or equipment in violation of this section shall be removed by order of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission or the State Tax Commission.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 1987 General Session

